src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
* **+Sem/Act_Clth** =
* **+Sem/Act_Domain** =
* **+Sem/Act_Domain_Measr** =
* **+Sem/Act_Event** =
* **+Sem/Act_Feat** =
* **+Sem/Act_Feat-psych** =
* **+Sem/Act_Fruit** =
* **+Sem/Act_Group** =
* **+Sem/Act_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Act_Hum_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Act_Money** =
* **+Sem/Act_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Act_Obj-play** =
* **+Sem/Act_Org** =
* **+Sem/Act_Perc-emo** =
* **+Sem/Act_Plc** = A persons job is an activity, and a place as well
* **+Sem/Act_Prod-audio** =
* **+Sem/Act_Prod-vis** =
* **+Sem/Act_Route** = Activity and Route, ie johtolat
* **+Sem/Act_Semcon** =
* **+Sem/Act_State** =
* **+Sem/Act_Time** =
* **+Sem/Act_Tool-it** =
* **+Sem/Act_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Amount_Build** =
* **+Sem/Amount_Semcon** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Body** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Body-abstr_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Build** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Build_Hum_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Buildpart** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Cat** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Clth** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Feat_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Feat_Plant** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Food** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Group** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Group_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Group_Prod-vis** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Hum_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Hum_Time** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Org** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Plc_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Ani_State** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Substnc** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Time** =
* **+Sem/Ani_Veh** =
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Mat** =
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Obj-clo** =
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Perc-phys** =
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Plant** =
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Plc_Route** =
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Substnc** =
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Substnc_Wthr** =
* **+Sem/Body-abstr_Feat-psych** =
* **+Sem/Body-abstr_Prod-audio_Semcon** =
* **+Sem/Body_Body-abstr** =
* **+Sem/Body_Buildpart** =
* **+Sem/Body_Clth** =
* **+Sem/Body_Clthpart** =
* **+Sem/Body_Food** =
* **+Sem/Body_Fruit** =
* **+Sem/Body_Group_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Body_Group_Hum_Time** =
* **+Sem/Body_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Body_Mat** =
* **+Sem/Body_Measr** =
* **+Sem/Body_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Body_Obj_Tool-catch** =
* **+Sem/Body_Org** =
* **+Sem/Body_Part** =
* **+Sem/Body_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Body_Plc-elevate** =
* **+Sem/Body_Plc_State** =
* **+Sem/Body_State** =
* **+Sem/Body_Time** =
* **+Sem/Build-room_Furn** =
* **+Sem/Build-room_Org** =
* **+Sem/Build_Build-room** =
* **+Sem/Build_Buildpart** =
* **+Sem/Build_Clthpart** =
* **+Sem/Build_Edu_Org** =
* **+Sem/Build_Event_Org** =
* **+Sem/Build_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Build_Org** =
* **+Sem/Build_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Build_Route** =
* **+Sem/Build_Tool** =
* **+Sem/Build_Veh** =
* **+Sem/Buildpart_Ctain_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Buildpart_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Buildpart_Obj_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Buildpart_Part** =
* **+Sem/Buildpart_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Buildpart_Prod-audio** =
* **+Sem/Cat_Edu** =
* **+Sem/Cat_Feat** =
* **+Sem/Cat_Feat-psych_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Cat_Group_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Cat_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Cat_Measr** =
* **+Sem/Cat_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Cat_Plantpart** =
* **+Sem/Cat_Plantpart_Semcon** =
* **+Sem/Cat_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr** =
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Fruit** =
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Money** =
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Org** =
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Plant** =
* **+Sem/Clth_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Clth_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Clth_Part** =
* **+Sem/Clth_Sur** =
* **+Sem/Clthpart_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Ctain-abstr_Org** =
* **+Sem/Ctain-clth_Plant** =
* **+Sem/Ctain-clth_Veh** =
* **+Sem/Ctain_Feat-phys** =
* **+Sem/Ctain_Furn** =
* **+Sem/Ctain_Obj-surfc** =
* **+Sem/Ctain_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Ctain_Tool** =
* **+Sem/Ctain_Tool-measr** =
* **+Sem/Ctain_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Curr_Org** =
* **+Sem/Dance_Org** =
* **+Sem/Dance_Prod-audio** =
* **+Sem/Dir_Geom** =
* **+Sem/Domain_Edu** =
* **+Sem/Domain_Feat** =
* **+Sem/Domain_Feat-phys** =
* **+Sem/Domain_Food-med** =
* **+Sem/Domain_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Domain_Ideol** =
* **+Sem/Domain_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Domain_Org** =
* **+Sem/Domain_Org_Plc-abstr** =
* **+Sem/Domain_Perc-emo** =
* **+Sem/Domain_Prod-audio** =
* **+Sem/Domain_State-sick** =
* **+Sem/Domain_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Drink_Plant** =
* **+Sem/Drink_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Drink_Plc_Substnc** =
* **+Sem/Edu_Event** =
* **+Sem/Edu_Geom** =
* **+Sem/Edu_Geom_Plc-line** =
* **+Sem/Edu_Group_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Edu_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Edu_Mat** =
* **+Sem/Edu_Org** =
* **+Sem/Edu_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Event_Food** =
* **+Sem/Event_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Event_Org** =
* **+Sem/Event_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Event_Plc-elevate** =
* **+Sem/Event_Time** =
* **+Sem/Feat-measr_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Food_State** =
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Plc-line** =
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Tool-write** =
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Veh** =
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Wthr** =
* **+Sem/Feat-psych_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Feat-psych_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Feat_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Feat_Plant** =
* **+Sem/Food_Part** =
* **+Sem/Food_Perc-phys** =
* **+Sem/Food_Plant** =
* **+Sem/Food_Substnc** =
* **+Sem/Food_Time** =
* **+Sem/Fruit_Sport** =
* **+Sem/Furn_Ctain-abstr** =
* **+Sem/Game_Obj-play** =
* **+Sem/Geom_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Geom_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Group_Hum** =
* **+Sem/Group_Hum_Org** =
* **+Sem/Group_Hum_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Group_Hum_Prod-vis** =
* **+Sem/Group_Org** =
* **+Sem/Group_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Group_Prod-vis_Txt_Veh** =
* **+Sem/Group_Sign** =
* **+Sem/Group_State** =
* **+Sem/Group_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Hum-abstr** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Lang** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Lang_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Lang_Time** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Mat_Tool** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Money** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Obj_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Org** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Part** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Plant** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Rule** =
* **+Sem/Hum_State** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Tool** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Tool-catch** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Veh** =
* **+Sem/Hum_Wthr** =
* **+Sem/Lang_Tool** =
* **+Sem/Lang_Tool-catch** =
* **+Sem/Mat_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Mat_Part** =
* **+Sem/Mat_Plant** =
* **+Sem/Mat_Plantpart** =
* **+Sem/Mat_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Mat_Tool** =
* **+Sem/Mat_Tool-catch** =
* **+Sem/Mat_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Measr_Plc_Time** =
* **+Sem/Measr_Sign** =
* **+Sem/Measr_Time** =
* **+Sem/Money_Obj** =
* **+Sem/Money_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Money_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Obj-ling_Obj-surfc** =
* **+Sem/Obj-play** =
* **+Sem/Obj-play_Sport** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Part_Sign** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Perc-emo** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Plantpart** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Plc-abstr** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Plc_Semcon** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Process** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Prod-audio** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Semcon** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Sign** =
* **+Sem/Obj_State** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Tool-music** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Tool-write** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Obj_Veh** =
* **+Sem/Org_Play** =
* **+Sem/Org_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Org_Prod-audio** =
* **+Sem/Org_Prod-cogn** =
* **+Sem/Org_Prod-vis** =
* **+Sem/Org_Rule** =
* **+Sem/Org_State** =
* **+Sem/Org_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Org_Veh** =
* **+Sem/Part_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Part_Plc_Prod-audio** =
* **+Sem/Part_Prod-cogn** =
* **+Sem/Part_Substnc** =
* **+Sem/Part_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Perc-emo_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Perc-emo_State** =
* **+Sem/Perc-emo_Wthr** =
* **+Sem/Plant_Plantpart** =
* **+Sem/Plant_Plc** =
* **+Sem/Plant_Time_Wthr** =
* **+Sem/Plant_Tool** =
* **+Sem/Plant_Tool-measr** =
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr_Rel_State** =
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr_Route** =
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr_Rule** =
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr_State** =
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Plc_Pos** =
* **+Sem/Plc_Route** =
* **+Sem/Plc_State** =
* **+Sem/Plc_Substnc** =
* **+Sem/Plc_Substnc_Wthr** =
* **+Sem/Plc_Time** =
* **+Sem/Plc_Time_Wthr** =
* **+Sem/Plc_Tool-catch** =
* **+Sem/Plc_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Plc_Wthr** =
* **+Sem/Prod-audio_Prod-vis** =
* **+Sem/Prod-audio_Substnc** =
* **+Sem/Prod-audio_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Prod-cogn_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Route_State** =
* **+Sem/Route_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Rule_Txt** =
* **+Sem/Semcon_State** =
* **+Sem/Semcon_Txt** =
* **+Sem/State-sick_Substnc** =
* **+Sem/State_Veh** =
* **+Sem/Substnc_Wthr** =
* **+Sem/Time_Wthr** =
* **+Sem/Tool-music** =

Not sure which section this goes in: (before POS)

* +Allegro from LEXICON GOADE-IU-

## Derivation tags

The following tags are used to describe the dynamic derivational system in
Lule Sámi as encoded in this lexical description. The tags are classified
according to a positional system, where each tag can be in one and only one
position, and can only combine with tags from an earlier / lower position.
This is done to avoid possible overgeneration in the derivational system.

* **+Der1 +Der2 +Der3 +Der4 +Der5**:    - positional tags, preceeds the actual der tag
### Der#1 tags - tags in first position
* +Der/Caus VV - previously Der/ahtte
* +Der/PassD VV - dallat passive
* +Der/PassL VV - long passive láhpeduvvat
* +Der/PassS VV - Short passive láhpput
* +Der/adda VV
* +Der/ahtja VV - only odd syll verbs take this der
* +Der/ahttjá VV - only odd syll verbs take this der
* +Der/alla VV
* +Der/asste VV
* +Der/d VV
* +Der/dalla VV
* +Der/dasste VV
* +Der/l VV
* +Der/ladda VV
* +Der/lahtte VV
* +Der/lasste VV
* +Der/st VV
* +Der/stahtte VV
* +Der/stalla VV
* +Der/stasste VV
* +Der/tj VV
* +Der/u/a/åd VV
* +Der/r VN  - NomAg contracted verbs - guollit-guollár
* +Der/NomInstr VN  - even verbs:fierrot-fierun
* +Der/Dimin NN
* +Der/gusj Prop -I

* +Der/lasj NN
* +Der/k NN / NA
* +Der/Car NA - abessive. Only even/contr. Morén-Duolljá:caritive
* +Der/ferjak NA   Adjectival -k der (from ?)
* +Der/lasj NA - dont know, guess it Tronds, ojes, I see - is this ok?jes 2 Der:lasj Noun on 1472 Adj on 2040
* +Der/n NA. Denominal -n adjective (similar t -k adj)
* +Der/sasj NA
* +Der/segak NA Adj. -k der from?
* +Der/Comp AA
* +Der/Superl AA

### Der#2 tags - tags in second position
* +Der/dahtte VV
* +Der/duhtte VV
* +Der/ahkes VA
* +Der/NomAct VN
### Der#3 tags - tags in third position
* +Der/duvva VV
* +Der/InchL VV (previosuly Der/goahte)
* +Der/mus VN
* +Der/NomAg VN -diddje
* +Der/dahka VN
* +Der/NomAct VN   Realised in two different ways.
*       This realisation is Der3. Outcommented
*       to not define the tag twice, but kept
*       here for documentation purposes.
* +Der/lis VA
### Der#4 tags - tags in fourth position
* +Der/ahtes NA ! Abessive. Even verbs>NomAct>ahtes and odd-syll nouns. Morén-Duolljá:Caritive
### Der#5 tags - tags in fifth position
* +Der/AAdv NA AAdv, previously +Der/at
* +Der/akti NumAdv Adv
* +Der/vuota NA AN (tag harmonization: previosuly Der/vuohta)
### Der#other tags - tags that can be in any position

There are no such tags in SMJ, but for symmetry and code coherence with SME
the class is still kept.
